Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20148-1109
Registration of securities; denial,
suspension, or revocation; grounds.

The director may issue
a stop order denying effectiveness to, or suspending or revoking the effectiveness
of, a registration statement to register securities by coordination if he or she finds
that the order is in the public interest and that:

(1) Any such registration statement registering securities, as of its
effective date or as of any earlier date in the case of an order denying effectiveness,
is incomplete in any material respect or contains any statement which was,
in the light of the circumstances under which it was made, false or misleading
with respect to any material fact;

(2) Any provision of the Securities Act of Nebraska or any rule, order,
or condition lawfully imposed under the act has been violated, in connection
with the offering by the person filing the registration statement, the issuer,
any partner, limited liability company member, officer, or director of the
issuer, any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions,
or any person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by the issuer,
but only if the person filing the registration statement is directly or indirectly
controlled by or acting for the issuer or any underwriter;

(3) The security registered or sought to be registered is the subject
of a permanent or temporary injunction of any court of competent jurisdiction
entered under any other federal or state act applicable to the offering. The
director may not institute a proceeding against an effective registration
statement under this subdivision more than one year from the date of the injunction
relied on, and he or she may not enter an order under this subdivision on
the basis of an injunction entered under any other state act unless the injunction
was based on facts which would currently constitute a ground for a stop order
under this section;

(4) When a security is sought
to be registered by coordination, there has been a failure to comply with
the undertaking required by subdivision (2)(g) of section 8-1106;

(5) The applicant or registrant
has failed to pay the proper registration fee. The director may enter only
a denial order under this subdivision and shall vacate any such order when
the deficiency has been corrected. The director may not enter an order against
an effective registration statement on the basis of a fact or transaction
known to him or her when the registration statement became effective;

(6) The authority of the applicant
or registrant to do business has been denied or revoked by any other governmental
agency;

(7) The issuer's or registrant's
literature, circulars, or advertising is misleading, incorrect, incomplete,
or calculated to deceive the purchaser or investor;

(8) All or substantially all
the enterprise or business of the issuer, promoter, or guarantor has been
found to be unlawful by a final order of a court or administrative agency
of competent jurisdiction; or

(9) There is a refusal to
furnish information required by the director within a reasonable time to be
fixed by the director.

Laws 1965, c. 549, § 9, p. 1783;

Laws 1967, c. 29, § 2, p. 144;

Laws 1973, LB 167, § 4;

Laws 1977, LB 263, § 4;

Laws 1987, LB 27, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 98;

Laws 1994, LB 884, § 13;

Laws 2013, LB214, § 5.